District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-108.05

Statement of dissolution.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 805, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720

History

1981 Ed., § 41-158.5.

Prior Codifications